District of Columbia statutes.
9-1010

Separability.

Except as provided in § 9-1006(h), if any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this chapter and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

Oct. 30, 1986, 100 Stat. 3341-376, Pub. L. 99-591, § 6011
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 9-1001.
1981 Ed., § 7-1510.